04_Morphology/eus.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>              ! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>           ! Noun
%<indef%>       ! Indefinite
%<def%>         ! Definite
%<sing%>        ! Singular
%<pl%>          ! Plural
!Animate definite plural
%<abs%>         ! Absolutive
%<erg%>         ! Ergative 
%<dat%>         ! Dative 
%<gen%>         ! Genitive 
%<inst%>        ! Instrumental
%<com%>         ! Comitative 
%<ben%>         ! Benefactive
%<csl%>         ! Causal 
!Inanimate definite singular
%<ine%>         ! Inessive 
%<ela%>         ! Elative 
%<all%>         ! Allative 
%<ter%>         ! Terminal
%<dir%>         ! Directional
%<lgen%>        ! Local genitive
%<dest%>        ! Destinative
%<igen%>        ! Inanimate genitive
!Archicharacters
%{a%}           ! Archivowel 'a'
%{e%}           ! Archivowel 'e'
%{r%}           ! Archicharacter 'r'


LEXICON Root

INANIMATE_NOUNS ;
ANIMATE_NOUNS ;



LEXICON A_N

%<n%>: CASEI ;

LEXICON CASEI

%<indef%>: # ; ! "indefinite"
%<def%>%<sing%>:%>%{r%}%{a%} # ; ! "definite singular"
%<def%>%<pl%>:%>%{r%}%{a%}k # ; ! "definite plural"

%<abs%>: # ; ! "intransitive subject, transitive direct object" 
%<erg%>:%>%{r%}%{e%}k # ; ! "transitive subject"
%<dat%>:%>%{r%}%{e%}i # ; ! "indirect object (to, for)"
%<gen%>:%>%{r%}en # ; ! "possession (of, 's)"
%<inst%>:%>%{e%}z # ; ! "means or topic (with, by, about)"
%<com%>:%>%{r%}ekin # ; ! "accompaniment or means (with)"
%<ben%>:%>%{r%}entzat # ; ! "beneficiary (for)"
%<csl%>:%>%{r%}engatik # ; ! "cause, reason (because of, for)"

LEXICON ANIMATE_NOUNS

gizon:gizon A_N ; ! "man" ; 
andere:andere A_N ; ! "woman" ;
senar:senar A_N ; ! "husband" ; 
emazte:emazte  A_N ; ! "wife" ;
alab:alab A_N ; ! "daughter" ;
seme:seme A_N ; ! "son" ;
irakasle:irakasle A_N ; ! "cousin" ;
ume:ume A_N ; ! "child" ;
lagun:lagun A_N ; ! "friend" ;
asto:asto A_N ; ! "donkey" ;
zaldi:zaldi A_N ; ! "horse" ;
txakur:txakur A_N ; ! "dog" ;
hartz:hartz A_N ; ! "bear" ;
txori:txori A_N ; ! "bird" ;
arrano:arrano A_N ; ! "eagle" ;




LEXICON I_N

%<n%>: CASEII ;

LEXICON CASEII

%<indef%>: # ; ! "indefinite"
%<def%>%<sing%>:%>%{a%} # ; ! "definite singular"
%<def%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}k # ; ! "definite plural"

%<ine%>:%>%{a%}n # ; ! "spatial or temporal location (in, at, on)"
%<ela%>:%>tik # ; ! "source of motion (from, since, out of)"
%<all%>:%>ra # ; ! "goal of motion (to)"
%<ter%>:%>raino # ; ! "termination (as far as, up to, until)"
%<dir%>:%>rantz # ; ! "direction of motion (toward)"
%<lgen%>:%>%{a%}rena # ; ! "pertaining to where/when: 'of', 'from'"
%<dest%>:%>rako # ; ! "inanimate destination ('for' a thing)"
%<igen%>:%>ko # ; ! "genitives in (some) inanimates"


LEXICON INANIMATE_NOUNS

ibai:ibai I_N ; ! "river" ;
etxe:etxe I_N ; ! "house" ; 
azoka:azoka I_N ; ! "market"
eskola:eskola I_N ; ! "school" ; 
eliza:eliza I_N ; ! "church" ;
lorategi:lorategi I_N ; ! "garden" ;
okindegi:okindegi I_N ; ! "bakery" ; 
harategi:harategi I_N ; ! "butchery" ;
zuhaitz:zuhaitz I_N ; ! "tree" ; 
mahai:mahai I_N ; ! "table" ; 
liburu:liburu I_N ; ! "book" ; 
ate:ate I_N ; ! "door" ; 
mendi:mendi I_N ; ! "mountain" ;

!Inanimate nouns taking "other" cases 
etxe:etxe A_N ; ! "house" ;
azoka:azoka A_N ; ! "market"
eskola:eskola A_N ; ! "school" ;
lorategi:lorategi A_N ; ! "garden" ;
mendi:mendi A_N ; ! "mountain" ; 
